Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.005

Strict enforcement.

This chapter shall be strictly enforced. Therefore, the doctrine of substantial compliance shall not be used by the department in the application and construction of this chapter. Anyone engaged in the activities of a contractor is presumed to know the requirements of this chapter.

[ 1997 c 314 s 1.]